Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4015.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "cash for tolls act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Infrastructure" means a bridge, highway, or tunnel. (b) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or other legal entity. (c) "Public infrastructure" means infrastructure that is owned, operated, or managed by this state, the state transportation department, or any other state or local governmental entity. (d) "Toll" means a charge payable for permission to use a particular bridge, highway, or tunnel. Sec. 3. (1) If this state, the state transportation department, or any other state or local governmental entity charges a toll to use public infrastructure, payment for that toll must be accepted subject to both of the following: (a) Cash must be accepted as a form of payment. (b) Payment must not be required to be made using an alternative to cash, including, but not limited to, with a credit card or other electronic payment. (2) This section applies only to public infrastructure, and does not apply to infrastructure that is owned by a private person.